Utah statutes.
59-12-117.   Refusal to make or falsifying returns -- Evasion of payment of
a tax -- Aiding or abetting an attempt to evade the payment of a tax --
Penalties -- Criminal violations.
(1)  It is unlawful for any seller to:
(a)  refuse to make any return required to be made under this chapter;
(b)  make any false or fraudulent return or false statement on any return;
(c)  evade the payment of a tax, or any part of a tax imposed by this chapter;
or
(d)  aid or abet another in any attempt to evade the payment of the tax or any
part imposed by this chapter.
(2)  Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter, except as
provided in Section 59-12-107, is guilty of a criminal violation as provided
in Section 59-1-401.
(3)  In addition to the penalties described in Subsection (2), any person who
knowingly swears to or verifies any false or fraudulent return, or any return
containing any false or fraudulent statement is guilty of the offense of
perjury and on conviction of perjury shall be punished in the manner provided
by law.
(4)  Any company making a false return or a return containing a false
statement is guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.
(5)  Any person failing or refusing to furnish any return required to be made,
failing or refusing to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by
the commission, or rendering a false or fraudulent return is guilty of a
criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401 for each offense.
(6)  Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any report under
this chapter, who makes any false or fraudulent return with intent to defeat
or evade the assessment or determination of amount due required by law to be
made is guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401 for
each offense.
(7)  Any violation of the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise
provided, shall be a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.
